Hawaii statutes.
§88F-2 State deferred compensation
retirement plan for state and county part-time, temporary, and seasonal or
casual employees. The State may establish a deferred compensation
retirement plan in accordance with sections 457 and 3121 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, for the benefit of employees to defer a portion of
their compensation to a future period of time. Participation in the plan shall
be mandatory, with a mandatory payroll deduction by the employee equal to seven
and five-tenths per cent of the employee's gross monthly wages, which shall be
contributed to the plan. A county may enter into a formal agreement with the
State to extend the State's plan and its provisions to part-time, temporary,
and seasonal or casual employees of the county; provided that:

(1) The agreement designates one of the county's
agencies to locally coordinate the plan; and

(2) The department of human resources development may
levy fees on the county pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with chapter
91. [L 1996, c 212, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 178, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next